Maryland, session 2026, SB0120.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Insurance
15–135.1.
(a) (1) In this section the following words have the meanings indicated.
(2) “Carrier” means an insurer, nonprofit health service plan, health
maintenance organization, or dental plan organization that provides dental benefits on an
expense–incurred basis under policies or contracts issued or delivered in the State.
(3) “Dental preventive care” means a preventive dental visit, screening,
oral examination, teeth cleaning (prophylaxis), fluoride treatment, or routine preventive
service that is a covered benefit under a policy or contract issued or delivered by a carrier.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *sb0120*

SENATE BILL 120
(b) If benefits for dental preventive care are available and all other requirements
for the coverage of dental preventive care are met, a carrier shall provide coverage for
dental preventive care:
(1) at any time during the plan year for a policy or contract that provides
coverage for dental preventive care once during the plan year; or
(2) subject to subsection (c) of this section, in accordance with any
frequency limitation for a policy or contract that provides coverage for dental preventive
care more than once during the plan year.
(c) A carrier may not impose a frequency limitation on dental preventive care that
requires the dental preventive care to be provided at an interval greater than [120] 90 days
during a plan year.
(d) This section may not be construed to require coverage for a service not
otherwise required by law.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall apply to all
policies, contracts, and health benefit plans issued, delivered, or renewed in the State on or
after January 1, 2027.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
January 1, 2027.